Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 10 Bail

Construction of territorial provision. —

Though a federal statute had reference to the giving of a recognizance rather than a bond as means of securing the offender, a territorial act which provided for bail bond was construed not to be in conflict therewith. Swan v. United States, 3 Wyo. 151, 9 P. 931,

1886 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1886).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

8 Am. Jur. 2d Bail and Recognizance § 1 et seq.

Immunity from service of process of nonresident defendant in criminal case, released on bail, 20 ALR2d 163.

Mandamus to compel judge or other officer to grant bail to accused or to accept proferred sureties, 23 ALR2d 803.

Failure to appear, and the like, resulting in forfeiture or conditional forfeiture to bail, as affecting right to second admission to bail in same noncapital criminal case, 29 ALR2d 945.

Death of principal as defense available to surety on bail or appearance bond, 63 ALR2d 830.

Appealability of order relating to forfeiture of bail, 78 ALR2d 1180.

Insanity of accused as affecting right to bail in criminal case, 11 ALR3d 1385.

Validity, construction and application of statutes regulating bail bond business, 13 ALR3d 618.

Dismissal or vacation of indictment as terminating liability of surety on bail bond, 18 ALR3d 1354.

Pretrial preventive detention by state courts, 75 ALR3d 956.

Application of state statutes establishing pretrial release of accused on personal recognizance as presumptive form of release, 78 ALR3d 780.

Validity of statute abolishing commercial bail bond business, 19 ALR4th 355.

Liability of surety on bail bond taken without authority, 27 ALR4th 246.

Right of defendant in state court to bail pending appeal from conviction — modern cases, 28 ALR4th 227.

Bail: duration of surety's liability on pretrial bond, 32 ALR4th 504.

Bail: effect on liability of bail bond surety of state's delay in obtaining indictment or bringing defendant to trial, 32 ALR4th 600.

Bail: effect on surety's liability under bail bond of principal's incarceration in other jurisdiction, 33 ALR4th 663.

Bail: effect on surety's liability under bail bond of principal's subsequent incarceration in same jurisdiction, 35 ALR4th 1192.

Propriety of applying cash bail to payment of fine, 42 ALR5th 547.

Bail bond forfeiture proceedings as civil or criminal for purposes of time for appeal under Rule 4 of Federal Rules of Appellate Procedure, 70 ALR Fed 952.

Propriety of denial of pretrial bail under Bail Reform Act (18 USC §§ 3141 et seq.), 75 ALR Fed 806.

What is “a substantial question of law or fact likely to result in reversal or an order for a new trial” pursuant to 18 USC § 3143(b)(2) [18 USC § 3143(b)(1)(B)] respecting bail pending appeal, 79 ALR Fed 573.

8 C.J.S. Bail §§ 29 to 31, 59.

§ 7-10-101.
Right of defendant.

A person arrested for an offense not punishable by death may be admitted to bail.

A person arrested for an offense punishable by death may be admitted to bail at the discretion of the authorized judicial officer as defined by W.S.

7-10-104

, except the defendant shall not be admitted to bail if the proof is evident or the presumption great in the case.

During the pendency of an appeal in a bailable case, the judge of the court having jurisdiction may admit the defendant to bail in any sum he deems proper. The judge allowing bail may at any time revoke or amend the order admitting the defendant to bail.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 42; R.S. 1887, § 3199; R.S. 1899, § 5162; C.S. 1910, § 6067; C.S. 1920, § 7364; R.S. 1931, § 33-301; C.S. 1945, § 10-401; W.S. 1957, § 7-199; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 5; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to right to bail of person subject to extradition, see §

7-3-216

.

As to constitutional right to bail, see art. 1, § 14, Wyo. Const.

The 2004 amendment,

in (c), twice deleted “or justice” following “the judge.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

No right of parolee to bail. —

A parolee who has been arrested and detained on a parole violation warrant has no right to be admitted to bail. Pisano v. Shillinger, 814 P.2d 274,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1991).

Quoted

in

Morrison v. State, 2012 WY 41, 272 P.3d 321,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Mar. 20, 2012).

Stated

in

Garton v. State, 910 P.2d 1348,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 7-10-102.
Matters governed by rules.

The rules promulgated by the Wyoming supreme court shall govern in all matters relating to the terms, amount and conditions of bail, justification of sureties and procedures for forfeiture, enforcement and exoneration upon breach or default of the conditions of bail.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 43; R.S. 1887, § 3200; R.S. 1899, § 5163; C.S. 1910, § 6068; C.S. 1920, § 7365; R.S. 1931, § 33-302; C.S. 1945, § 10-402; W.S. 1957, § 7-200; Laws 1985, ch 147, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to procedures in regard to bail, see Rule 3.1, W.R. Cr. P.

Quoted

in

Morrison v. State, 2012 WY 41, 272 P.3d 321,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Mar. 20, 2012).

§ 7-10-103.
Continuation for defendant bound over to district court.

An order admitting to bail a defendant who is subsequently bound over to answer for a criminal offense in district court shall continue unless amended or revoked by the district court. The order of the court of limited jurisdiction admitting the defendant to bail, together with any cash, appearance bond or other security, shall be transmitted to the clerk of the district court and made a part of the record.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 46; R.S. 1887, § 3203; R.S. 1899, § 5166; C.S. 1910, § 6071; C.S. 1920, § 7368; R.S. 1931, § 33-305; C.S. 1945, § 10-405; W.S. 1957, § 7-203; W.S. 1977, §

7-10-105

; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Justice's jurisdiction. —

Justice binding accused over to district court may admit him to bail at such time or at any time after filing transcript of preliminary proceedings in district court, on or without application, up until time district court obtains complete jurisdiction on filing indictment or information. Doherty v. Patterson, 33 Wyo. 374, 239 P. 1045,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1925).

§ 7-10-104.
Authorized judicial officers.

A person charged with the commission of any bailable offense may be admitted to bail by:

A justice of the supreme court;

A district judge or district court commissioner of the district in which the person is charged; or

A circuit judge, or magistrate of the county in which the person is charged.

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 2.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 47; R.S. 1887, § 3204; Laws 1890, ch. 30, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 5167; C.S. 1910, § 6072; C.S. 1920, § 7369; R.S. 1931, § 33-306; C.S. 1945, § 10-406; W.S. 1957, § 7-204; W.S. 1977, §

7-10-106

; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

As to powers of district court commissioner, see §

5-3-307

.

As to powers of magistrate with respect to bail, see § 5-9-208(c)(vi).

The 2004 amendment

deleted former (a)(iv), which read: “A justice of the peace of the county in which the person is charged,” and made related changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Clerk taking bail not unconstitutional. —

Law permitting clerk of court, in vacation, to take bail and fix its amount is not unconstitutional, as conferring judicial power on said clerk. State v. Sureties of Krohne, 4 Wyo. 347, 34 P. 3,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1893) (decided prior to 1987 revision of this title).

Cited

in

Doherty v. Patterson, 33 Wyo. 374, 239 P. 1045,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(1925).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Court's power and duty, pending determination of habeas corpus proceedings on merits, to admit petitioner to bail, 56 ALR2d 668.

§ 7-10-105.
Disposition of forfeited proceeds.

Any proceeds recovered as a result of the forfeiture of bail in any criminal case shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the public school fund of the county in which the defendant was admitted to bail.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 58; Laws 1884, ch. 36, § 1; afd1886, ch. 103, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 3215; R.S. 1899, § 5178; C.S. 1910, § 6083; C.S. 1920, § 7380; R.S. 1931, § 33-317; C.S. 1945, § 10-417; W.S. 1957, § 7-215; W.S. 1977, § 7-10-117; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to apportionment of funds belonging to county school fund, see §

21-13-207

.

Cited

in

Beagle v. State, 2004 WY 30, 86 P.3d 1271,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(2004).

§ 7-10-106.
Technical defects.

In any proceeding to enforce or forfeit bail it shall be no defense that there was a failure by the court to note or record the default nor that there was a defect in the form of the appearance bond unless the defect misled the defendant to his prejudice.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 61; R.S. 1887, § 3219; R.S. 1899, § 5181; C.S. 1910, § 6086; C.S. 1920, § 7383; R.S. 1931, § 33-320; C.S. 1945, § 10-420; W.S. 1957, § 7-218; W.S. 1977, § 7-10-120; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4.